Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-243
Extraterritorial airport; joint exercise of powers.

The powers granted by sections 3-241 and 3-242 may be exercised jointly by two or more states or governmental agencies, including this state and its governmental agencies, in such combination as may be agreed upon by them.

Laws 1949, c. 1, § 4, p. 56.